Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB745.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.2. Resident Associations and Group Meetings.--(a) A manufactured home community owner may not prohibit or interfere with the operation of a resident association.(b) A manufactured home community owner shall allow group meetings on site between residents without any limitations related to the number of residents, location of the meetings and the timing of meetings.123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. Section 6(c) and (e) introductory paragraph and (2) of the act are amended to read:Section 6. Disclosure of Fees.--* * *(c) Failure to disclose such rent, fees, service charges and assessments shall render them void and unenforceable in the courts of the Commonwealth. Increases in such rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the owner shall be unenforceable until [30] 180 days after notice thereof has been posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the manufactured home community and mailed to the manufactured home lessee. However, rent shall not be increased during the term of the lease.* * *(e) All new leases, lease extensions and lease renewals[, which are for more than a 60-day period,] shall contain the following full disclosures:* * *(2) An explanation of the manner in which the manufactured home space rental amount will be increased, including, but not limited to, notification to the manufactured home lessee at least [60] 180 days in advance of the increase.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 6.1. Reasonable Increases in Rent and Fees.-- (a) A manufactured home community owner or manufactured home community operator may increase rent, fees, service charges or assessments for any 12-month period, effective upon the renewal or extension of a lease for a manufactured home lot on or after the effective date of this subsection, if the following conditions are 20250SB0745PN0872 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 satisfied:(1) The community owner or community operator posts notice of the proposed increase in a public area within the manufactured home community at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the increase and notifies all manufactured home lessees and manufactured home tenants of the proposed rent increase by certified mail addressed to their residences at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the increase.(2) Except as provided in sections 6.2 and 6.3, and except for charges imposed by a limited equity cooperative association subject to 68 Pa.C.S. Pt. II Subpt. C (relating to cooperatives), the aggregate increase in rent, fees, service charges and assessments does not exceed the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Northeast Region, for the most recently available 60-month period except:(i) i f the average 60-month CPI-U is lower than 2%, the aggregate increase in rent, fees, service charges and assessments does not exceed 2%; and(ii) i f the average 60-month CPI-U is greater than 4%, the increase in rent, fees, service charges and assessments does not exceed 4%.(b) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall publish the average 60-month CPI-U monthly on a publicly accessible Internet website and shall transmit the information as a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Except as provided in section 6.3, no community owner or community operator that has been found by a local code official, the Department of Environmental Protection, other enforcement entity or court to be in violation of any applicable health or 20250SB0745PN0872 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 safety law or regulation may increase rent, fees, service charges or assessments unless the violation has been fully resolved at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the increase.(d) Failure to comply with the procedure specified in this section shall render any attempted increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments void and unenforceable in the courts of the Commonwealth.Section 6.2. Justified Rent Increase to Support Extraordinary Increases in Operating Expenses.--(a) A manufactured home community owner or manufactured home community operator increasing rent, fees, service charges or assessments under section 6.1(a) may exceed the limits specified in section 6.1(a)(2) up to an additional 2%, as necessary to support extraordinary increases in operating expenses, if the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The community owner or community operator posts notice of the proposed extraordinary increase in a public area within the manufactured home community at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the increase and notifies all manufactured home lessees and manufactured home tenants of the proposed extraordinary rent increase by certified mail addressed to their residences at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the increase. The notice must include copies of a financial summary certified as accurate by the owner or its accounting firm, including:(i) the community owner's or community operator's operating budget;(ii) a description of the operating cost item or items that have increased, the amount of the increase and the impact of the 20250SB0745PN0872 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 increase on the owner's or operator's revenues, expenses and profit;(iii) an estimate of the amount of revenue that will be generated as a result of the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments; and(iv) an explanation of the lessees' rights to request a meeting with the owner pursuant to this section and to oppose the extraordinary increase by filing a complaint with the Attorney General or filing a legal action in the court of common pleas.(2) The community owner or community operator provides an opportunity for the resident association, if one exists, or a committee designated by a petition signed by at least 25% of the households residing on the lots that would be subject to the proposed increase, to request a meeting with the owner in writing at any time within 30 days of the posting and delivery of the notice if requested. The owner must meet with the resident association or committee in person at a mutually convenient place and time within 15 days of the request. The meeting must be open to all residents who wish to attend. At the meeting, the owner must in good faith disclose and explain all material factors resulting in the decision to propose the increase, as well as any other matter concerning the operation and management of the community that the resident association or committee wishes to discuss.(b) At any time after 45 days from the posting and delivery of the notice, a lessee, group of lessees or resident association, if one exists, may challenge the reasonableness of the proposed increase by filing a complaint with the Attorney General or by initiating a civil action in the court of common 20250SB0745PN0872 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pleas. In either case it shall be the community owner's or community operator's burden to demonstrate that the amount of the requested increase is an accurate estimate of the amount needed to cover the documented increase in the owner's eligible operating expenses.(c) If the Attorney General attempts to resolve the dispute through mediation and the owner or operator declines to participate, the increase shall be void and unenforceable.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Maintenance costs for which the owner is solely responsible." The cost of routine maintenance and repair of all roads, sidewalks, parking pads, storm water drainage systems and common areas; the routine maintenance, care, removal and replacement of all trees within the community; and the routine maintenance and repair of all sewer lines, water lines, utility service lines and related connections owned and provided by the community owner or community operator to the utility pedestal or manufactured home space."Operating expense." Taxes, insurance, utility charges, onsite employee costs, maintenance costs for which the owner is solely responsible and third-party charges that are directly necessary for the operation of the community. The term does not include any cost related to acquisition, capital improvements, debt service or any increase in the return on the owner's investment.Section 6.3. Temporary Surcharge for Capital Improvements.--(a) A manufactured home community owner or manufactured home community operator may require lessees to pay a temporary 20250SB0745PN0872 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surcharge to cover all or part of the cost of the nonroutine repair, replacement or construction of major infrastructure systems or amenities if all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The community owner or community operator posts notice of the proposed surcharge in a public area within the manufactured home community at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the surcharge and notifies all manufactured home lessees and manufactured home tenants of the proposed surcharge by certified mail addressed to their residences at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the surcharge. In the event of urgent repair needs, the 180-day notice period may be shortened by order of court. The notice must include the nature of the proposed improvements; the estimated date of completion of the improvements; the total amount of the surcharge; the estimated cost to finance and complete the improvements, both total and itemized; the share of that cost to be covered by the owner's funds, by the surcharge, and by insurance proceeds or other sources if applicable; the per-lot monthly amount of the surcharge; and the proposed duration of the surcharge.(2) At least 75% of the households residing on the lots that would be subject to the surcharge consent to the surcharge in writing or all of the conditions specified in subsection (b) have been satisfied.(3) The annual surcharge does not exceed 4% of the total amount of all rent, fees, service charges or assessments in effect for the previous year. In any year in which a surcharge is in effect, the total of all surcharges and any annual rent increase may not exceed 7.5% of the total amount of all rent, 20250SB0745PN0872 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fees, service charges or assessments in effect for the previous year. The surcharge may not be included in the base rent when calculating rent increases for subsequent years.(4) The community owner records a mortgage lien against the property, in the total amount of the capital improvement surcharge, in favor of the resident association, if one exists. The mortgage must be payable out of the proceeds of any sale or refinancing of the community.(b) A community owner or community operator that is prohibited from increasing rent, fees, service charges or assessments under section 6.1(c) may require lessees to pay a temporary surcharge to cover all or part of the cost of capital improvements necessary for the correction of health or safety violations if, in addition to the conditions specified in subsection (a)(1), the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The community owner or community operator provides the lessees, in the notice required under subsection (a)(1):(i) a copy of the enforcement agency notice or court order describing the health or safety violation that the surcharge is intended to correct;(ii) a copy of a financial summary certified as accurate by the owner or its accounting firm, to include the community owner's or community operator's operating budget, sufficient to enable the lessees to identify the amount of available cash reserves and owner distributions; and(iii) an explanation of the lessees' right to oppose the surcharge by filing a complaint with the Attorney General or filing a legal action in the court of common pleas.(2) The community owner or community operator provides an opportunity for the resident association, if one exists, or a 20250SB0745PN0872 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee designated by a petition signed by at least 25% of the households residing on the lots that would be subject to the proposed increase, to request a meeting with the owner in writing at any time within 30 days of the posting and delivery of the notice if requested. The owner must meet with the resident association or committee in person at a mutually convenient place and time within 15 days of the request. The meeting must be open to all residents who wish to attend. At the meeting, the owner must in good faith disclose and explain all material factors resulting in the decision to propose the surcharge, as well as any other matter concerning the operation and management of the community that the resident association or committee wishes to discuss.(c) At any time after 45 days from the posting and delivery of the notice, a lessee, group of lessees or resident association, if one exists, may challenge the reasonableness of the proposed surcharge by filing a complaint with the Attorney General, in which event the Attorney General may attempt to resolve the dispute through mediation or by initiating a civil action in the court of common pleas. In either case, it shall be the owner or operator's burden to demonstrate that:(1) the proposed corrections will resolve all known health or safety violations;(2) the projected cost of repairs and improvements is reasonable;(3) the community owner will assume a reasonable share of the cost of repairs and improvements;(4) the terms of financing, if any, are reasonable;(5) the community owner has provided a surety bond or letter of credit that satisfies the requirements of subsection (d); and20250SB0745PN0872 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) the amount of the proposed surcharge is no more than is reasonably necessary to complete the repairs.(d) A surety bond or letter of credit must: (1) Be payable to the resident association if one exists, or to the Department of Environmental Protection, a code enforcement agency, a court, a local redevelopment agency or other public entity, as applicable, as the holder.(2) Be i n an amount sufficient to fund 100% of the total capital improvements surcharge.(3) Contain the purpose of securing that the community owner or community operator will correct all known health or safety violations by a specified date, which cannot be later than one year after the date of the notice of the proposed surcharge.(4) Entitle the holder to make a claim on the surety bond or draw on the letter of credit in order to cause the violations to be corrected, if the owner fails to do so by the specified date.(5) Be issued by an admitted carrier that is licensed in this Commonwealth and that has a rating from AM Best of A or better or if a letter of credit, the letter of credit is issued by a federally insured financial institution.Section 4. Section 13(e) and (f) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Damages.--* * *(e) When the manufactured home community owner or operator and a manufactured home lessee execute a new, renewed or extended lease for a manufactured home space, which increases rent or payables to the lessor, the manufactured home community owner or operator may not collect increased rent or fee payable rent from the manufactured home lessee until the manufactured home community owner or operator and the manufactured home 20250SB0745PN0872 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lessee have entered into the new, renewed or extended lease. After [receiving 60 days' notice of the community owner's or operator's intent to offer a new lease,] the latest to occur of the following, as applicable, the manufactured home occupant shall have [30] 60 days to either accept the new, renewed or extended rental agreement or to notify the manufactured home community owner or operator of intent to vacate within [30 days.] 120 days:(1) receipt of the community owner's or operator's intent to offer a new lease;(2) receipt of notification by the Attorney General that the lessee's complaint challenging the reasonableness of the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges, or assessments or proposed surcharges for capital improvements has been closed; or(3) the issuance of a final decision on any legal challenge to the proposed increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments or proposed surcharge for capital improvements.No increased rent or fee lease charges shall be effective against a lessee prior to the [61st] 180th day after receiving the owner or operator notice.(f) A manufactured home lessee who chooses not to enter into a new, renewed or extended rental agreement shall have [60] 150 days from the date of notification of intent to vacate the manufactured home community to enter into contract to sell or to relocate the manufactured home. No increased rent fee or lease charge shall apply during this period. So long as the manufactured home community owner or operator complied with [disclosure as provided in section 6,] the requirements of sections 6, 6.1, 6.2 and 6.3, as applicable, the manufactured 20250SB0745PN0872 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 home lessee who does not enter into a new, extended or renewed rental agreement shall not be entitled to relocation costs.(g) In addition to all other available rights, remedies and damages, an affected lessee may file an action for abatement, nullification or restitution of any increase in rent, fees, service charges or assessments that was imposed in violation of section 6, 6.1, 6.2 or 6.3.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0745PN0872 - 12 - 12345678